Oregon, session 2026R1, HB5201.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to ______, for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $______ for ______.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $______
is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for ______ from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the ______.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $______
is established for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses for ______ from federal funds collected or received by the ______.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 326